Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
Article 1 General Provisions
37-2-6.1.
Community service boards — Executive director, staff, budget, facilities; powers and duties; exemption from state and local taxation.

The governing board of each community service board shall employ an executive director to serve as its chief executive officer and shall prescribe the duties thereof. The selection of the executive director and all terms of compensation shall be set by
the governing board of each community service board and shall be subject to review and approval by the commissioner prior to any offer of employment or at any point thereafter where the terms of compensation are proposed
to be substantially altered. Such contracts shall be reviewed by the commissioner every five years. Further, the commissioner shall be required to review and approve the selection of the executive director of each community
service board for adherence to minimum qualifications for the position as prescribed by the department. The executive director shall direct the day-to-day operations of the community service board. Such executive director
shall be appointed and removed by the community service board pursuant to this subsection and shall appoint other necessary staff pursuant to an annual budget adopted by the board, which budget shall provide for securing
appropriate facilities, sites, and professionals necessary for the provision of disability and health services. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the governing board of the community service board
may delegate any power, authority, duty, or function to its executive director or other staff. The executive director or other staff is authorized to exercise any power, authority, duty, or function on behalf of the governing
board of the community service board.

The executive director or any full-time or part-time employee of a community service board shall have a responsibility to avoid any conflict of interest in a manner that is consistent with the declarations found in Code Section 45-10-21. Such employees
shall not transact any business with that community service board as prohibited in Code Section 45-10-23 unless any such transaction falls under the exceptions granted in Code Section 45-10-25. Transactions that fall under
such exceptions shall be disclosed to the governing board of the community service board in the manner as such governing board shall determine and yearly to the Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Commission
as prescribed in Code Section 45-10-26. The governing board of the community service board shall promulgate policies and procedures governing executive director and employee conflicts of interest and establish a code of
ethics for the executive director and employees of the community service board.

The governing board of each community service board or each community service board, under the jurisdiction of its governing board, shall perform duties, responsibilities, and functions and may exercise power and authority described in this subsection
as follows:

The governing board of each community service board shall adopt bylaws for the conduct of its affairs and the affairs of their respective community service boards; provided, however, that the governing board of a community service board shall meet at
least quarterly, and that all such meetings and any bylaws shall be open to the public, as otherwise required under Georgia law;

The governing board of each community service board shall be required to review and approve the annual budget of the community service board and shall be required to establish the general policies related to such budget to be followed by the community
service board;

Each community service board shall provide an adequate range of disability services as prescribed by the department;

Each community service board may make and enter into all contracts necessary and incidental to the performance of its duties and functions;

Each community service board may acquire by purchase, gift, lease, or otherwise and may own, hold, improve, use, and sell, convey, exchange, transfer, lease, sublease, and dispose of real and personal property of every kind and character, or any interest
therein, for its corporate purposes;

Each community service board may contract to utilize the services of the Department of Administrative Services, the state auditor, or any other agency of state, local, or federal government;

Each community service board may provide, either independently or through contract with appropriate state or local governmental entities, the following benefits to its employees, their dependents, and survivors, in addition to any compensation or other
benefits provided to such persons:

Retirement, pension, disability, medical, and hospitalization benefits, through the purchase of insurance or otherwise, but medical and hospitalization benefits may only be provided through the Department of Community Health under the same conditions
as provided for such benefits to state employees, and the Department of Community Health shall so provide if requested;

Life insurance coverage and coverage under federal old age and survivors’ insurance programs;

Sick leave, annual leave, and holiday leave; and

Any other similar benefits including, but not limited to, death benefits;

Each community service board may cooperate with all units of local government in the counties where the community service board provides services as well as neighboring regions and with the programs of other departments, agencies, and regional commissions
and regional planning boards;

Each community service board shall establish and maintain a personnel program for its employees and fix the compensation and terms of compensation of its employees; provided, however, that each community service board shall comply with the provisions
of Chapter 20 of Title 45, for so long as and to the extent that each employee of such board remains subject to the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board or as otherwise provided by law;

Each community service board may receive and administer grants, gifts, contracts, moneys, and donations for purposes pertaining to the delivery of disability services or of health services;

Each community service board may establish fees for the provision of disability services or health services according to the terms of contracts entered into with the department, Department of Human Services, Department of Public Health, or Department
of Community Health, as appropriate; provided, however, that all fees collected shall be used solely in accordance with the statutory nonprofit and public purposes of community service boards as prescribed in this article;

Each community service board may accept appropriations, loans of funds, facilities, equipment, and supplies from local governmental entities in the counties where the community service board provides services;

Each member of the governing board of a community service board may, upon approval of the executive director, receive reimbursement for actual expenses incurred in carrying out the duties of such office; provided, however, that such reimbursement shall
not exceed the rates and allowances set for state employees by the Office of Planning and Budget or the mileage allowance for use of a personal car as that received by all other state officials and employees or a travel
allowance of actual transportation cost if traveling by public carrier;

The governing board of each community service board shall elect a chairperson and vice chairperson from among its membership. The governing board members shall also elect a secretary and treasurer from among its membership or may designate the executive
director of the community service board to serve in one or both offices. Such officers shall serve for such terms as shall be prescribed in the bylaws of the community service board or until their respective successors
are elected and qualified. No governing board member shall hold more than one office of the governing board of a community service board; except that the same person may serve as secretary and treasurer. The bylaws of the
governing board of a community service board shall provide for any other officers of such board and the means of their selection, the terms of office of the officers, and an annual meeting to elect officers;

Each community service board may have a seal and alter it;

Each community service board may establish fees, rates, rents, and charges for the use of facilities of the community service board for the provision of disability services or of health services, in accordance with the terms of contracts entered into
with the department, Department of Human Services, Department of Public Health, or Department of Community Health, as appropriate;

Each community service board may borrow money for any business purpose and may incur debt, liabilities, and obligations for any business purpose. A debt, liability, or obligation incurred by a community service board shall not be considered a debt, liability,
or obligation of the state or any county or any municipality or any political subdivision of the state. A community service board may not borrow money as permitted by this Code section if the highest aggregate annual debt
service requirements of the then current fiscal year or any subsequent year for outstanding borrowings of the community service board, including the proposed borrowing, exceed 15 percent of the total revenues of the community
service board in its fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in which such debt is to be incurred. Interest paid upon such borrowings shall be exempt from taxation by the state or its political subdivisions. A
state contract with a community service board shall not be used or accepted as security or collateral for a debt, liability, or obligation of a community service board without the prior written approval of the commissioner;

Each community service board, to the extent authorized by law and the contract for the funds involved, may carry forward without lapse fund balances and establish operating, capital, and debt reserve accounts from revenues and grants derived from state,
county, and all other sources; and

Each community service board may operate, establish, or operate and establish facilities deemed by the community service board as necessary and convenient for the administration, operation, or provision of disability services or of health services by
the community service board and may construct, reconstruct, improve, alter, repair, and equip such facilities to the extent authorized by state and federal law.

Nothing shall prohibit a community service board from contracting with any county governing authority, private or other public provider, or hospital for the provision of disability services or of health services.

Each community service board exists for nonprofit and public purposes, and it is found and declared that the carrying out of the purposes of each community service board is exclusively for public benefit and its property is public property. Thus, no community
service board shall be required to pay any state or local ad valorem, sales, use, or income taxes.

A community service board shall not have the power to tax, the power to issue general obligation bonds or revenue bonds or revenue certificates, or the power to financially obligate the state or any county or any municipal corporation.

A community service board shall not operate any facility for profit. A community service board may fix fees, rents, rates, and charges that are reasonably expected to produce revenues, which, together with all other funds of the community service board,
will be sufficient to administer, operate, and provide the following:

Disability services or health services;

The cost of acquiring, constructing, equipping, maintaining, repairing, and operating its facilities; and

The creation and maintenance of reserves sufficient to meet principal and interest payments due on any obligation of the community service board.

Each community service board may provide reasonable reserves for the improvement, replacement, or expansion of its facilities and services. Reserves under this subsection shall be subject to the limitations in paragraph (17) of subsection (b) of this
Code section.

Each county and municipal corporation of this state is authorized to convey or lease property of such county or municipal corporation to a community service board for its public purposes. Any property conveyed or leased to a community services board by
a county or municipal corporation shall be operated by such community service board in accordance with this chapter and the terms of the community service board’s agreements with the county or municipal corporation providing such
conveyance or lease.

Each community service board and any entity created or formed by such community service board pursuant to subsection (j) of this Code section shall keep books of account reflecting all funds received, expended, and administered by the community service
board in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. The community service board and an entity created or formed by such community service board, if any, pursuant to subsection (j) of this Code section shall assure
the inclusion in its annual audit any information or procedures required by the department. The community service board and an entity created or formed by such community service board, if any, pursuant to subsection (j) of this
Code section shall rotate audit firms at least once every five years. Copies of the annual audit and all findings shall be submitted to the department and the governing board of the community service board, or in the case of an
entity created or formed by the community service board, if any, to the governing board of the community service board, the governing board of such entity, and the department within 60 days of completion of the audit.

Subject to the approval of the commissioner and the governing board of the community service board, a community service board may create, form, or become a member of a nonprofit corporation, limited liability company, or other nonprofit entity, the voting
membership of which shall be limited to community service boards, governmental entities, nonprofit corporations, or a combination thereof, if such entity is created for purposes that are within the powers of the community service
board, for the cooperative functioning of its members, or a combination thereof; provided, however, that no funds provided pursuant to a contract between the department and the community service board may be used in the formation
or operation of the nonprofit corporation, limited liability company, or other nonprofit entity. No community service board, whether or not it exercises the power authorized by this subsection, shall be relieved of compliance with
Chapter 14 of Title 50, relating to open and public meetings, and Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50, relating to inspection of public records, unless otherwise provided by law. The provisions of this subsection relating to the
approval of the commissioner to the contrary notwithstanding, nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a community service board from creating, forming, or becoming a member of a national, regional, or state trade association
or business league as defined for tax exempt purposes by the United States Internal Revenue Service for the benefit of member community service boards and similar organizations.

No community service board shall employ or retain in employment, either directly or indirectly through contract, any person who is receiving a retirement benefit from the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia except in accordance with the provisions
of Code Section 47-2-112; provided, however, that any such person who is employed as of July 1, 2004, may continue to be employed.

A community service board may join or form and operate, either directly or indirectly, one or more networks of community service boards, disability or health service professionals, and other providers of disability services or health services to arrange
for the provision of disability services or health services through such networks; to contract either directly or through such networks with the Department of Community Health to provide services to Medicaid beneficiaries; to provide
disability services or health services in an efficient and cost-effective manner on a prepaid, capitation, or other reimbursement basis; and to undertake other disability or health services related managed care activities. For
purposes of this subsection only and notwithstanding Code Section 33-3-3 or any other provision of law, a community service board shall be permitted to and shall comply with the requirements of Chapter 20A of Title 33 to the extent
that such requirements apply to the activities undertaken by the community service board or by a community service board under this subsection or subsection (j) of this Code section. No community service board, whether or not it
exercises the powers authorized by this subsection, shall be relieved of compliance with Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50, relating to inspection of public records, unless otherwise provided by law. Any licensed health care
provider shall be eligible to apply to become a participating provider under such a plan or network that provides coverage for health care, disability services, or health services which are within the lawful scope of the provider’s
license, but nothing in this Code section shall be construed to require any such plan or network to provide coverage for any specific health care, disability service, or health service.

History. Code 1981, §

37-2-6.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 16; Ga. L. 1994, p. 437, § 5; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, §§ 1-7, 2-4, 2-5; Ga. L. 2004, p. 150, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 6/HB 1223; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2009, p.
745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 37/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 5-23/HB 214; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-58/HB 642; Ga. L. 2014, p. 309, § 5/SB 349; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 37/HB 90; Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 7-1/HB 252; Ga. L. 2016,
p. 864, § 37/HB 737; Ga. L. 2020, p. 474, § 1/SB 176.

The 2020 amendment,
effective January 1, 2021, substituted “Code Section 47-2-112” for “subsection (c) of Code Section 47-2-110” in the middle of subsection (k).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which enacts this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that this Code section is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would
have repealed this Code section.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 10/HB 1223, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to affect or abate any right accrued or vested prior to July 1, 2006, or any action or proceeding commenced prior to July 1,
2006, under any law amended or repealed by this Act.”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 11/HB 1223, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that those provisions of that Act which authorize community service boards to amend their bylaws and authorize county governing authorities to appoint no sooner than May
1, 2006, any community service board members to take office on July 1, 2006, shall become effective April 21, 2006.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative
Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 54(e)/HB 90, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “In the event of a conflict between a provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2015 regular session of the General Assembly,
the provision of such other Act shall control over the conflicting provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act to the extent of the conflict.” Accordingly, the amendment to this Code section by Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 37/HB 90, was
not given effect.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 1-1/HB 252, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘J. Calvin Hill, Jr., Act.”’

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

37-2-6.2.
Employees whose jobs include duties or functions which became duties or functions of a community service board on July 1, 1994; rights, duties, and benefits of employees.

Those employees whose job descriptions, duties, or functions as of June 30, 1994, included the performance of employment duties or functions which will become employment duties or functions of the personnel of a community service board on July 1, 1994,
shall become employees of the applicable community service boards on and after July 1, 1994. Such employees shall be subject to the employment practices and policies of the applicable community service board on and after
July 1, 1994. Employees who are subject to the rules of the State Personnel Board and who are transferred to a community service board shall retain all existing rights under such rules. Retirement rights of such transferred
employees existing under the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia or other public retirement systems on June 30, 1994, shall not be impaired or interrupted by the transfer of such employees and membership in any such
retirement system shall continue in the same status possessed by the transferred employees on June 30, 1994, without any interruption in membership service and without the loss of any creditable service. For purposes of
coverage under the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, such employees transferred to the community service boards on July 1, 1994, shall be deemed to be state employees. Accrued annual and sick leave possessed by said
employees on June 30, 1994, shall be retained by said employees as employees of the community service board. Any person who is granted employment rights and benefits as a member of a community service board pursuant to
this subsection and who later becomes employed, without any break in service, by the department, Department of Human Services, or Department of Public Health, a hospital thereof, another community service board, a county
board of health for which such person provides services pursuant to this title, or a regional board shall retain, in that later employment position, all such rights and benefits. Such rights and benefits shall also be retained
by any person who is employed on June 30, 1994, by the former Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Addictive Diseases (now known as the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities)
of the former Department of Human Resources, a hospital thereof, a county board of health for which such person provides services pursuant to this title, or a regional board and who later becomes employed, without any break
in service, by a community service board.

Classified employees of a community service board under this chapter shall in all instances be employed and dismissed in accordance with rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board.

All rights, credits, and funds in the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia which are possessed by personnel transferred by provisions of this Code section to the community service boards are continued and preserved, it being the intention of the General
Assembly that such persons shall not lose any rights, credits, or funds to which they may be entitled prior to becoming employees of the community service boards.

As to those persons employed by the former Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Addictive Diseases (now known as the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities) of the former Department of Human Resources, a hospital
thereof, or a regional board on June 30, 1994, any termination from state employment after that date of any such person who is a member of the classified service shall not result from the anticipated or actual employment or utilization
by:

The department;

A regional board;

A community service board;

A hospital;

The Department of Human Services;

The Department of Public Health; or

Any private provider of disability services or health services of any person who is not an employee of the state or a political subdivision thereof to perform the duties and functions of such terminated state personnel unless such termination and utilization
is the result of a reduction in appropriations for such duties or functions or is the result of a reduction in force caused by any other state department or agency which has ceased to contract with the department, the Department
of Human Services, or the Department of Public Health for the services which had been provided by the terminated state personnel.

History. Code 1981, §

37-2-6.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 16; Ga. L. 1994, p. 437, § 6; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446,
§ 2-59/HB 642.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1994, “boards” was substituted for “boards,” at the first instance of that term in paragraph (a)(3).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which enacts this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that this Code section is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would
have repealed this Code section.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative
Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

37-2-6.3.
Public body; lawsuits; debts, obligations, and liabilities.

A community service board is a public body as provided in paragraph (1) of subsection (c) of Code Section 37-2-11.1.

A community service board has the power to bring an action in its own name and, to the extent otherwise authorized by law and to the extent not immune from suit, may be sued in its own name. The state and the counties in which the community service board
operates shall not be considered a party to or liable under any such litigation.

The governing board of a community service board as well as the community service board itself shall be prohibited from bringing any action against the state.

Debts, obligations, and liabilities of a community service board are not debts, obligations, or liabilities of the state or of the counties in which such board operates. A community service board is prohibited from entering into debts, obligations, or
liabilities which are also debts, obligations, or liabilities of the state or of any county.

History. Code 1981, §

37-2-6.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 2-6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 37/SB 46; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2014, p. 309, § 6/SB 349.

37-2-6.4.
Reconstituting or converting of organizational structure; formation of new community service board.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, a community service board may reconstitute or convert its organizational structure in the following ways:

With the approval of the governing board of the community service board and the approval of the county governing authorities of the counties served by the community service board, the community service board may convert to a private nonprofit corporation.
So long as the reconstituted organization continues to serve a public purpose as defined by the department, the Department of Human Services, or the Department of Public Health, as appropriate, such organization shall be
authorized to retain the use of assets, equipment, and resources purchased with state and federal funds by the former community service board. In the event the new private nonprofit fails to serve such public purpose, those
assets, equipment, and resources purchased by the former community service board with state and federal funds shall be returned to the department, the Department of Human Services, or the Department of Public Health, as
appropriate, or to an agency designated by such department. For a period of three years following the community service board’s conversion to a private nonprofit corporation, the private nonprofit corporation shall ensure
that consumers of disability services or health services, as appropriate, and family members of such consumers constitute a majority of the appointed board members and that the various disability groups and health services
groups are equitably represented on the board of the nonprofit corporation;

With the approval of the governing board of the community service board and the approval of all of the county governing authorities of the counties served by the community service board, the community service board may convert to a unit of county government.
All assets, equipment, and resources of the community service board shall be transferred to the new unit of county government; or

With the approval of the governing board of the community service board and the approval of all of the county governing authorities of the counties served by the community service board, the community service board may become a component part of a hospital
authority in those counties served by the community service board. So long as the hospital authority continues to serve a public purpose as defined by the department, the Department of Human Services, or the Department
of Public Health, as appropriate, the hospital authority shall be authorized to retain possession of those assets, equipment, and resources purchased by the community service board with state and federal funds. In the event
the hospital authority fails to serve such public purpose, those assets, equipment, and resources purchased by the community service board with state and federal funds shall be returned to the department, the Department
of Human Services, or the Department of Public Health, as appropriate, or to an agency designated by such appropriate department or departments.

In the event that all county governing authorities of a community service area designated pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 37-2-3 concur that a community service board reconstituted pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section has failed
to provide disability services or health services as required, those county governing authorities may request that the department coordinate the formation of a new community service board pursuant to Code Section 37-2-6. Upon notification
of the request, the department shall assist the county governing authorities in making appointments to the new community service board and establishing bylaws pursuant to Code Section 37-2-6. The department shall make a determination
about the disposition of all assets, equipment, and resources purchased with state or federal funding in the possession of the predecessor agency. To the extent that the community service board was providing disability services
or health services through the Department of Human Services or the Department of Public Health, such department or departments shall provide to the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities all documents, data,
information, and consultation necessary or helpful to the formation of the new community service board and the determination and disposition of assets, equipment, and resources of the community service board.

History. Code 1981, §

37-2-6.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 2-6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).